Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 318.11 of Title 52, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of this section:


1. “Operator” means the person authorized by the Corporation


Commission to drill, complete, and operate a well for the intended


development and production of oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons,


regardless of whether the well is completed or produces any;





Req. No. 3083 Page 1


2. “Plugging and site-restoration obligations” include all


duties to plug, re-plug, repair, remediate, or reclaim a well or


associated site;


3. “Successor” means any person or entity that acquires,


whether directly or indirectly, assets or operating interests from a


transferring operator; and


4. “Transfer” means any sale, assignment, conveyance, merger,


division, or other transaction by which an operator or its assets,


leases, wells, or operating interests are transferred to another


person or entity.


B. A successor shall be jointly and severally liable with the


transferring operator for all plugging and site-restoration


obligations associated with any well, lease, or operating interest


acquired through a transfer unless the Corporation Commission


determines, prior to the transfer, that the successor has provided


sufficient financial assurance to satisfy all such obligations.


C. Liability pursuant to subsection B of this section shall be


established under the following conditions:


1. The successor has inadequate capitalization to meet plugging


and restoration obligations as determined by:


a. submitted financial statements,


b. the estimated cost to plug and restore all acquired


wells as provided by the Commission, and


c. posted financial assurance;

Req. No. 3083 Page 2


2. The transfer is made to an entity that shares ownership,


management, officers, or controlling persons with the transferring


operator and the transfer would reasonably diminish the ability of


the transferring operator or successor to satisfy plugging


obligations;


3. The transferring operator is insolvent, financially


distressed, or subject to foreclosure, or has outstanding unpaid


regulatory penalties or compliance orders at the time of the


transfer;


4. The transaction has the effect of avoiding or delaying


plugging obligations including any transfer for nominal or non-arm’s


length consideration; or


5. Any material misrepresentation or omission related to the


condition of wells, estimated plugging costs, or financial assurance


submitted to the Commission in connection with the transfer.


D. 1. A successor shall conduct reasonable due diligence


regarding the condition of all wells, associated liabilities, and


plugging and site-restoration obligations prior to any transfer.


2. A transferring operator shall provide accurate and complete


information regarding well condition, production status, mechanical


integrity, and estimated plugging costs.


3. Failure by either the transferring operator or the successor


to comply with this subsection shall constitute an independent basis


for successor liability.

Req. No. 3083 Page 3


4. The Corporation Commission shall promulgate rules to


establish minimum due-diligence requirements including well


inspection standards, documentation of mechanical integrity and


environmental conditions, cost estimates for plugging and


restoration, and disclosure of outstanding violations or enforcement


orders.


E. 1. A surface rights owner shall be entitled, upon written


request, to receive from the operator and successor:


a. documentation of due diligence pursuant to subsection


D of this section,


b. known environmental or mechanical conditions that may


affect the surface or groundwater, and


c. financial assurance information of the operator or


successor submitted to the Commission.


2. A surface rights owner may, within thirty (30) days of


receiving notice of a proposed transfer or upon discovering a


violation of this section, file with the Commission:


a. a petition alleging inadequate due diligence,


b. a request to stay approval of the transfer until


deficiencies are corrected, or


c. a request for an administrative hearing regarding the


adequacy of the successor’s financial assurance.


3. A surface rights owner that is harmed by an operator’s or


successor’s failure to perform due diligence or misrepresentation

Req. No. 3083 Page 4


related to a transfer may bring a civil action in district court for


injunctive relief, recovery of actual damages, including


contamination or surface restoration costs, and attorney fees and


court costs.


4. An operator or successor shall not take adverse action


against a surface rights owner for exercising rights pursuant to


this section. Retaliatory conduct shall be subject to penalties as


determined by the Commission.


F. 1. No transfer of operator status, well ownership, or


operating interest is effective unless approved by the Commission


after review of due-diligence submissions, surface-owner notices,


and financial assurance documents.


2. The transferring operator shall provide written notice to


all affected surface rights owners no later than thirty (30) days


before Commission consideration of a transfer.


3. Failure to provide notice invalidates the transfer and


constitutes a violation of this section.


4. The Commission may disapprove or stay any transfer if:


a. due-diligence requirements have not been met,


b. the successor lacks adequate financial assurance, or


c. a surface-owner petition pursuant to paragraph 2 of


subsection E of this section is pending and


nonfrivolous.



Req. No. 3083 Page 5


5. If an unapproved transfer occurs, the successor and


transferring operator remain jointly and severally liable.


G. 1. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the


state’s rights under fraudulent transfer law, environmental


statutes, or common-law doctrines of successor liability.


2. Nothing herein shall impair the priority of claims under


federal bankruptcy law; however, successor liability shall apply to


post-petition acquisitions or transactions approved by the


bankruptcy court.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3083 CN 1/6/2026 9:29:52 AM

























Req. No. 3083 Page 6